ro-RO: Tip de mașină de acordat pentru banjo: Acordor cu angrenaj pentru a 5-a coardă; Fricțiune; Cu angrenaj; Stil chitară; Planetar; Altele
zh-TW: 班鳩琴調音類型: 第 5 弦齒輪式; 摩擦式; 齒輪式; 吉他風格; 行星齒輪式; 其他
tr: Banjo akort makinesi tipi: 5. tel dişlisi; Sürtünme; Dişlili; Gitar stili; Planet; Diğer
fi: Banjon virityskoneiston tyyppi: 5. kieli, vaihteistettu; Kitka; Vaihteistettu; Kitaratyylinen; Planeetta; Muu
it: Tipo di accordatore Banjo: 5a corda a ingranaggi; A frizione; A ingranaggi; Stile chitarra; Planetario; Altro
ja: Banjoチューニングマシンタイプ: 第 5 弦ギア付き; フリクション; ギア付き; ギタースタイル; プラネタリー; その他
de: Banjo-Stimmmechanikart: 5. Saite mit Getriebe; Friktion; Mit Getriebe; Gitarren-Stil; Planetarisch; Sonstige
zh-CN: 班卓琴调音机制类型: 5 弦齿轮式; 摩擦式; 齿轮式; 吉他式; 行星式; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de afinador de banjo: Tarraxa com engrenagem para 5ª corda; Fricção; Com engrenagem; Estilo guitarra; Planetária; Outro
el: Τύπος μηχανής κουρδίσματος/συντονισμού banjo: Με κλειδί 5ης χορδής; Τριβής; Με γρανάζι; Τύπου κιθάρας; Πλανητικού τύπου (Planetary); Άλλο
en: Banjo tuning machine type: 5th string geared; Friction; Geared; Guitar-style; Planetary; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta uglaševalne naprave banja: Mehanizem za 5. struno; Torni; Z zobniškim mehanizmom; Kitarski; Planetarni; Drugo
ko: 밴조 튜닝 머신 유형: 5번 줄 기어드; 마찰식; 기어드; 기타 스타일; 플래니터리; 기타
nl: Banjo stemmechaniek type: 5e snaar met tandwiel; Frictie; Met tandwiel; Gitaarstijl; Planetair; Overig
da: Type stemmemekanik på banjo: Gearet 5. streng; Friktion; Gearet; Guitarstil; Planetarisk; Andet
sk-SK: Typ ladiacej mechaniky bendža: Ladiaca mechanika s prevodom (5. struna); Trecie kolíky; Prevodová mechanika; V štýle gitary; Planetárna ladiaca mechanika; Iná
es: Tipo de máquina de afinación del banjo: Quinta cuerda con engranaje; De fricción; Con engranaje; Estilo guitarra; Planetario; Otro
vi: Loại bộ chỉnh dây đàn banjo: Bánh răng dây thứ 5; Ma sát; Bánh răng; Kiểu đàn guitar; Bánh răng hành tinh; Khác
pl: Typ kluczy stroikowych banjo: Z przekładnią dla 5. struny; Cierny; Z przekładnią; W stylu gitarowym; Planetarny; Inne
lt-LT: Banjo stygų derintuvo tipas: Su 5-osios stygos mechanizmu; Frikcinis; Redukcinis; Gitaros tipo; Planetarinis; Kita
sv: Banjons stämningsmaskinstyp: 5:e strängen, utväxlad; Friktion; Utväxlad; Gitarrstil; Planetväxel; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de máquina de afinar banjos: 5.ª corda com engrenagem; Fricção; Com engrenagem; Estilo guitarra; Planetário; Outro
bg-BG: Тип механизъм за настройване на банджото: С предавка за 5-та струна; Фрикционен; С предавка; Китарен тип; Планетарен; Друго
nb: Banjo stemmemaskintype: Giret 5. streng; Friksjon; Giret; Gitarstil; Planetarisk; Annet
th: ประเภทของลูกบิดตั้งสายแบนโจ: 5th string geared; ฟริกชัน; มีฟันเฟือง; สไตล์กีตาร์; แพลนเนททารี; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ ladící mechaniky banja: S převodem pro 5. strunu; Třecí; S převodem; Kytarový styl; Planetový; Jiné
fr: Type de mécaniques d’accordage du banjo: 5e corde à engrenage; Friction; À engrenage; Type guitare; Planétaire; Autre
hu: Banjo-hangolókulcs típusa: 5. húros áttételes; Súrlódásos; Áttételes; Gitár stílusú; Bolygóműves; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta štimera za bendžo: Za 5. žicu s prijenosom; Frikcijski; S prijenosom; U stilu gitare; Planetarni; Ostalo
ru: Тип колковых механизмов банджо: С редуктором для 5-й струны; Фрикционные; Редукторные; В гитарном стиле; Планетарные; Другое